01BArabicGuesser.xfst
clear stack
set char-encoding UTF-8
echo >>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>
echo NOUNS
echo >>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>
source arb-nouns.xfst
echo >>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>
echo VERBS
echo >>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>
source arb-verbs.xfst
echo >>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>
define digits [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9];
define Numbers digits+ [["+noun" "+card"]:0];
read regex < arb-Alphabet.txt
define Alphabet
define forTrans [
"^ss^" -> [] ,
"^se^" -> []
]
.o.
["[" -> [] ]
.o.
["]" -> [] ]
;
define forMWE [
"^ss^" -> "[" ,
"^se^" -> "]"
];
define clUpperIntermedLang [
["+masc" -> 0 || _ "+fem",,
"+masc" -> 0 || _ "+masc",,
"+fem" -> 0 || _ "+fem",,
"+fem" -> 0 || _ "+masc"
]
.o.
[
"^orig" Alphabet "^orig" -> [], 
"^dbl" digits "^dbl" -> []
]
.o.
[
"^orig" -> [], 
"^dbl" -> [], 
"^remya^" -> [] , 
"rrr" -> [] ,
"+token" -> %@
]
.o.
[%@ -> [] || _ %@ , .#. _ ]
];

define marktokens [
[
"+token" -> %@
]
.o.
[%@ -> [] || _ %@ , .#. _ ]
];
define cltokens [
%@ -> [],
"+token" -> []
]
;
define remExtras [
[
%@ -> "+token"
]
.o.
[
"+token" -> [] || _ "+token" , .#. _ 
]
];

! define remCashida
source arb-remcashida.txt

echo >>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>
echo GUESSER
echo >>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>
read regex [ArbNounsG.i | ArbVerbsG.i] .o. clUpperIntermedLang;
define ArabicGuesser
read regex [ArabicGuesser  .o. "ـ" -> [] .o. "^ss^" -> [] .o. "^se^" -> []].i .o. "+token" -> [] .o. "+pl" -> [] .o. "+dual" -> []  .o. "+defArt" -> [] .o. "ـ" -> [] .o. "^ss^" -> [] .o. "^se^" -> [];
save stack ArabicGuesser.fst
clear stack
